Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1020.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10ii. (1) Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section and until April 1, 2027, the commission shall not approve any contract, tariff, discount, or rate between an electric utility and a qualified data center. (2) As used in this section, "data center" means a facility in this state that is composed of 1 or more buildings and that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, data center equipment to centralize the storage and processing of data.